Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1325
Employee; retirement; death; payment for unused sick leave benefits.

Each employee who meets the minimum age and service requirements for retirement under any existing state or federal retirement system shall, upon termination of employment with the state by reason of retirement or voluntary resignation in lieu of retirement, be entitled to a one-time payment of one-fourth of his or her accumulated unused sick leave, with the rate of payment based upon his or her regular pay at the time of termination or retirement. Upon the death of an employee, his or her beneficiary shall be paid one-fourth of his or her accumulated unused sick leave, with the rate of payment based upon his or her regular pay at the date of death.

Laws 1973, LB 340, § 6;

Laws 1974, LB 1003, § 3;

Laws 1986, LB 325, § 14;

Laws 1986, LB 311, § 23.